Mississippi, session 2026, HB1602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-103-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-103-131.  (1)  If any officer or employee of any state agency whose duty it is to do so * * *shall refuses or fails to file * * *a an original budget request with such information and in such form and in such detail * * *and within such time as the Legislative Budget Office may require in the exercise of its authority, within thirty (30) calendar days after the deadline date for filing budget requests as published on the office's website, the director of such agency shall within ten (10) calendar days contract with a third party to prepare * * *and file, or cause to be prepared and filed, a budget request for the agency, * * *and which must be three percent (3%) lower than the agency's current budget from state general funds.  The director of the agency shall be exempt from any procurement procedures that may otherwise be applicable in procuring the services of the third party to prepare the agency's budget request. (2)  At the time of executing the contract, the director of the agency shall notify the members of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, Legislative Budget Office and the executive director of the Department of Finance and Administration in writing, which notice shall include the amount of the contract.  The contractor shall prepare and submit a budget request for the agency to the Legislative Budget Office within thirty (30) calendar days after the contract is executed.  If the contractor does not submit the agency's budget request within that time, the executive director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall not allow the agency to expend its current fiscal year appropriation until the budget request has been submitted. (3)  The agency failing to file a budget request shall be responsible for paying the contractor for preparing the agency's budget request.  If the agency does not pay the contractor within forty-five (45) calendar days after the contractor has prepared the budget request, the executive director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall not allow the agency to expend its current fiscal year appropriation until the contractor has been paid. If the agency does not pay the contractor as required, the expense * * *thereof shall be personally borne by * * *said the officer or employee who is responsible for preparing the agency's budget request, and he or she shall be responsible on his or her official bond for the payment of the expense * * *;. (4)  In recommending the agency's budget for the next fiscal year, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee shall not recommend a budget higher than the reduced amount in the budget request prepared by the contractor. (5)  * * *provided that A negligently prepared budget shall be considered as a refusal or failure under the provisions of this section. (6)  The records of the Legislative Budget Office and the overall budget submitted by it to the Legislature shall clearly identify and set forth all the facts relative to any agency budget request prepared by a third party contracted with by the director of the agency under the authority of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.